tests/syntax/loops.sbl
// Test loop commands
externals (stem)
define stem as (
  atleast 0 'x'
  atleast -1 'y'
  loop 1 'i'
  repeat 'y'
  try atleast len ()
  try atleast len true
  try atleast len false
  try repeat ()
  try repeat true
  repeat false
)
